Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.310

Nondiscrimination and fair housing provisions and education criteria—Administrative rule amendments. (Contingent effective date.)

The department shall adopt administrative rule amendments to chapter 308-125 WAC that require:

(1) Appraisers and appraiser trainees to adhere to the nondiscrimination and fair housing provisions as provided in the ethics rule in accordance with the appraisal standards board and the uniform standards of professional appraisal practice;

(2) Appraiser and appraiser trainees to adhere to all education criteria in accordance with the appraiser qualifications board as provided in the real property appraiser qualifications criteria.

[ 2023 c 464 s 3.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2023 c 464: "(1) This act takes effect upon the adoption of the administrative rules required in section 3 of this act.

(2) The department [of licensing] must provide notice of the effective date of this section to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the department." [ 2023 c 464 s 4.]